test/src/morphology/N-lipuuk_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - lipūk: # Noun 157 'eng /est süda/fin' - full paradigm
     lipūk+N+Sg+Nom: lipūk
     lipūk+N+Sg+Gen: lipūk
     lipūk+N+Sg+Par: lipūkt
     lipūk+N+Sg+Dat: lipūkõn
     lipūk+N+Sg+Ins: lipūkõks
     lipūk+N+Sg+Ill: lipūkõ
     lipūk+N+Sg+Ela: lipūkõst
     lipūk+N+Pl+Nom: lipūkõd
     lipūk+N+Pl+Gen: lipūkõd
     lipūk+N+Pl+Par: lipūkidi
     lipūk+N+Pl+Dat: lipūkõdõn
     lipūk+N+Pl+Ins: lipūkõdõks
     lipūk+N+Pl+Ill: lipūkiž
     lipūk+N+Pl+Ela: lipūkist
